src/fst/stems/exceptions.lexc
!! Exceptions are quite strange word-forms. the ones that do not fit anywhere 
!! else. This file contains all enumerated word forms that cannot reasonably be
!! created from lexical data by regular inflection. Usually there should be next
!! to none exceptions, it's always better to have a paradigm that covers only
!! one or few words than an exception since these will not work nicely with e.g.
!! compounding scheme or possibly many end applications.

LEXICON EXCEPTIONS

!! negation verb has partial inflection:
!!€gt-norm: 
!!€ en:      ei+V+Neg+Act+Sg1
!!€ älkää:   ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2
!!€ älkööt:  ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl3
ei+V+Neg+Act+Sg1:en             VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Sg1+Foc/ka:enkä    VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Sg2:et             VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Sg2+Foc/ka:etkä    VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Sg3:ei             VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Sg3+Foc/ka:eikä    VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Pl1:emme           VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Pl1+Foc/ka:emmekä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Pl2:ette           VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Pl2+Foc/ka:ettekä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Pl3:eivät          VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Pl3+Foc/ka:eivätkä VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg2:älä                  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Foc/ka:äläkä         VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg3:älköön               VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Sg3+Foc/ka:älköönkä      VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl1:älkäämme             VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl1+Foc/ka:älkäämmekä    VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2:älkää                VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl2+Foc/ka:älkääkä       VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl3:älkööt               VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
ei+V+Neg+Act+Imprt+Pl3+Foc/ka:älköötkä      VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!! Some verbs only have few word-forms left:
!!€ kutiaa:
!!€ taita:
!!€ paratkoon:
!!€ eläköön:
eläköön+V:eläköön       #    ;
jutaa+V:jutaa           #    ;
jytää+V:jytää           #    ;
kutiaa+V:kutiaa         #    ;
parata+V:parata         #    ;
paratkoon+V:paratkoon   #    ;
sikisi+V:sikisi         #    ;
sikiää+V:sikiää         #    ;
taita+V:taita           #    ;
tietä+V:tietä           #    ;
tuta+V:tuta             #    ;
vilkkaa+V:vilkkaa       #    ;


!! The noun ruoka has irregular forms:
!!€ ruuassa:
!!€ ruuilla:
ruoka+N:ruua        NOUN_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
ruoka+N:ruu         NOUN_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS ;

!! The adjective hyvä has heteroclitic comparative derivations too:
!!€ parempi:
!!€ paremmissa:
!!€ paras:
!!€ parhaat:
hyvä+A:pare                     ADJ_BACK_COMPARATIVE ;
hyvä+A+Superl:paras                ADJ_BACK_NOMINATIVE ;
hyvä+A+Superl:parhaa               ADJ_BACK_SINGULARS ;
hyvä+A+Superl:parha                ADJ_BACK_PLURALS ;
hyvä+A+Superl:paras                ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA ;
hyvä+A+Superl:parhaa               ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
hyvä+A+Superl:parha                ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
hyvä+A+Superl+Use/NG:parha                ADJ_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN ;
hyvä+A+Superl:parha                ADJ_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
hyvä+A+Superl:parha                ADJ_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN ;
hyvä+A:parha                    ADJ_BACK_SUPERLATIVE ;
hyvä+A+Der/sti+Adv:parhaiten    ADV_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;

!! Some of the nouns have archaic consonat stem forms left:
!!€ vuonna:
!!€ sydännä:
!!€ jumalten:
!!€ sankarten:
vuosi+N+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:vuonna       NOUN_BACK_POSS_AN_OPT ;
sydän+N+Sg+Ess+Use/NG:sydännä      NOUN_FRONT_POSS_ÄN_OPT ;
jumala+N+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:jumalten    NOUN_BACK_CLIT_OPT ;
jumala+N+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:jumalten    NOUN_COMPOUND ;
sankari+N+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:sankarten  NOUN_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;
sankari+N+Pl+Gen+Use/NG:sankarten  NOUN_COMPOUND ;

!! few verbs have shortened forms in standard spoken Finnish
!!€ meen:
!!€ tuut:
mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Dial/standard:meen       VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Dial/standard:meet       VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Dial/standard:meemme     VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
mennä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Dial/standard:meette     VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
mennä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Dial/standard:mee          VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT  ;
mennä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Dial/standard+Foc/s:mees   VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT    ;
tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Dial/standard:tuun       VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Dial/standard:tuut       VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Dial/standard:tuumme     VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Dial/standard:tuutte     VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
tulla+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Dial/standard:tuu          VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
tulla+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Dial/standard+Foc/s:tuus   VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
panna+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Dial/standard:paat       VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
panna+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Dial/standard:paa          VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
panna+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Dial/standard+Foc/s:paas   VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
olla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1+Dial/standard:oon         VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
olla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2+Dial/standard:oot         VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
olla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1+Dial/standard:oomme       VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
olla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2+Dial/standard:ootte       VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
olla+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Dial/standard:oo            VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;
olla+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2+Dial/standard+Foc/s:oos     VERB_BACK_CLIT_OPT       ;


LEXICON CONJUNCTIONVERB

ehkä+Pcle#ei+V+Neg:ehke  X_51ehkei  ;
ja+CC#ei+V+Neg:e  X_51eikä  ;
miksi++Adv+Interr#ei+V+Neg:mikse  X_51miksei  ;

!että+CS#ei+Neg:ette  X_51ettei  ; cs.lexc
!jotta+CS#ei+Neg+CS:jolle  X_51jollei  ; cs.lexc
!jotta+CS#ei+Neg:jotte  X_51jottei  ; cs.lexc
!mutta+CC#ei+Neg:mutte  X_51muttei  ; cc.lexc
!vaikka+CS#ei+Neg:vaikke  X_51vaikkei  ; cs.lexc


LEXICON X_51ehkei

+Act+Pl1:mme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl2:tte  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl3:ivät  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg1:n  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg2:t  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg3:i  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON X_51eikä

+Act+Pl1:mmekä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl2:ttekä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl3:ivätkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg1:nkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg2:tkä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg3:ikä  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


!LEXICON X_51ettei

!+Act+Pl1:mme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Pl2:tte  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Pl3:ivät  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg1:n  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg2:t  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg3:i  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


!LEXICON X_51jollei

!+Act+Pl1:mme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Pl2:tte  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Pl3:ivät  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg1:n  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg2:t  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg3:i  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


!LEXICON X_51jottei

!+Act+Pl1:mme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Pl2:tte  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Pl3:ivät  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg1:n  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg2:t  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg3:i  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON X_51miksei

+Act+Pl1:mme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl2:tte  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl3:ivät  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg1:n  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg2:t  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg3:i  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


!LEXICON X_51muttei

!+Act+Pl1:mme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Pl2:tte  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Pl3:ivät  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg1:n  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg2:t  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg3:i  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


!LEXICON X_51vaikkei

!+Act+Pl1:mme  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Pl2:tte  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Pl3:ivät  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg1:n  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg2:t  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

!+Act+Sg3:i  VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON X

and:and	X_FORGN_EN	;
by:by	X_FORGN_EN	;
mr.:mr.	X_FORGN_EN	;
new:new	X_FORGN_EN	;
of:of	X_FORGN_EN	;
the:the	X_FORGN_EN	;

LEXICON X_51ettei

+Act+Pl1:emme	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl1+Use/Arch:’emme	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl2:ette	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl2+Use/Arch:’ette	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl3:eivät	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Pl3+Use/Arch:’eivät	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg1:en	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg1+Use/Arch:’en	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg2:et	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg2+Use/Arch:’et	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg3:ei	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Sg3+Use/Arch:’ei	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;


LEXICON X_51äläkä

+Act+Imprt+Pl1:käämmekä	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Imprt+Pl2:kääkä	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Imprt+Pl2+Use/Arch:käättekä	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Imprt+Pl3:köötkä	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg2:äkä	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

+Act+Imprt+Sg3:köönkä	VERB_FRONT_CLIT_OPT ;

LEXICON X_FORGN_EN

+OLang/eng:	# ;
